Tennessee statutes. Title 3 Legislature
Part 3

Lobbyists

3-6-301. Part definitions.

As used in this part, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Administrative action” means the taking of any recommendation, report or nonministerial action; the making of any decision or taking any action to postpone any action or decision; action of the governor in approving or vetoing any bill or resolution; the promulgation of a rule; or any action of a quasi-legislative nature, by an official in the executive branch of state government; however, “administration action” does not include ordinary and routine permitting, licensing, or compliance decisions by an official of the executive branch of state government;

“Association” means any union, league, chamber of commerce, committee, club, or other membership organization;

“Attorney general” means the attorney general and reporter;

“Campaign contribution” means any contribution as defined by § 2-10-102;

“Candidate for public office” means any individual who has made a formal announcement of candidacy or who qualified under the law of this state to seek nomination for election or elections to any state public office, or has received contributions or made expenditures, except for incidental expenditures to determine if one shall be a candidate, or has given consent for a campaign committee to receive contributions or make expenditures, with a view to bringing about that person's nomination for election or the election to state public office, and any individual who has been nominated for appointment as an official in the legislative or executive branch;

“Compensation” means any salary, fee, payment, reimbursement or other valuable consideration, or any combination thereof, whether received or to be received; however, “compensation” does not include the salary or reimbursement of an individual whose lobbying is incidental to that person's regular employment;

“Employer of a lobbyist” or “employer” means any person or entity that employs, retains or otherwise arranges for a lobbyist to engage in lobbying on behalf of the person or entity for compensation. “Employer of a lobbyist” or “employer” specifically includes any such person or entity notwithstanding the lobbyist's status as an employee, agent, contractor, subcontractor or other representative lobbying on behalf of such person or entity for compensation. “Employer of a lobbyist” or “employer” does not include the individual employees, officers, directors, or members of a corporation, labor organization, association, or membership organization other than the chief executive officer and the chief financial officer or comparable individuals within such corporation, labor organization, association, or membership organization. For purposes of employer registration and disclosure pursuant to this part, a lobbying firm is not deemed to be the employer of any lobbyist within the firm;

“Executive agency” means any commission, board, agency, or other entity in the executive branch of the state government or any independent entity of the state government that is not a part of the legislative or judicial branch;

“Expenditure” means any advance, conveyance, deposit, distribution, transfer of funds, loan, payment, pledge, or subscription of money or anything of value, and any contract, agreement, promise, or other obligation, whether or not legally enforceable, to make an expenditure;

“Gift” means any payment, honorarium, subscription, loan, advance, forbearance, rendering or deposit of money or services, unless consideration of equal or greater value is received. “Gift” does not include a campaign contribution otherwise reported as required by law, a commercially reasonable loan made in the ordinary course of business, or a gift received from a member of the person's immediate family or from a relative within the third degree of consanguinity of the person or of the person's spouse, or from the spouse of any such relative. “Gift” does not include the waiver of a registration fee for a conference or educational seminar;

“Immediate family” means a spouse or minor child living in the household;

“Influencing legislative or administrative action” means promoting, supporting, influencing, modifying, opposing or delaying any legislative or administrative action by any means, including, but not limited to, the provision or use of information, statistics, studies, or analyses, but not including the furnishing of information, statistics, studies, or analyses requested by an official of the legislative or executive branch to that official or the giving of testimony by an individual testifying at an official hearing conducted by officials of the legislative or executive branch;

“Investigatory audit information” means data obtained pursuant to a finding of probable cause to believe that an employer or lobbyist has violated this part, including information pertaining to the source or amount of employer or lobbyist income, expenditures, receipts, assets, liabilities, net worth, or related financial or proprietary information that is received by, recorded by, prepared by, or collected by or on behalf of the ethics commission during the course of any audit, investigation or other examination undertaken for the purpose of ensuring compliance with, or imposing civil or criminal sanctions for violation of, this part. “Investigatory audit information” does not include data in a form that cannot, either directly or indirectly, be associated with, or otherwise be used to identify, directly or indirectly, a particular employer or lobbyist;

“Legislative action” means introduction, sponsorship, debate, voting or any other nonministerial official action or nonaction on any bill, resolution, amendment, nomination, appointment, report or any other matter pending or proposed in a legislative committee or in either house of the general assembly;

“Lobby” means to communicate, directly or indirectly, with any official in the legislative branch or executive branch for the purpose of influencing any legislative action or administrative action;

“Lobby” does not mean communications with officials of the legislative or executive branches by an elected or appointed public official performing the duties of the office held; a duly licensed attorney at law acting in a representative capacity on behalf of a client appearing before an official of the executive branch for the purpose of determining or obtaining such person's legal rights or obligations in a contested case action, administrative proceeding, or rule making procedure; or an editor or working member of the press, radio or television who, in the ordinary course of business, disseminates news or editorial comment to the general public;

“Lobby” does not mean communications by an incumbent or prospective contractor or vendor, or an employee of the contractor or vendor, while engaged in selling or marketing to the state, or any department or agency of the state, by demonstrating or describing goods or services to be provided or by inquiring about specifications, terms, conditions, timing, or similar commercial information. However, the contractor or vendor, or employee of the contractor or vendor, shall be deemed to be a lobbyist, solely for the purposes of § 3-6-305, if actively engaged in selling or marketing to an official in the executive branch or an official in the legislative branch whose duty it is to vote for, let out, overlook, or in any manner to superintend any work or any contract so marketed or sold;

“Lobby” does not mean communications by an employee of a school board, municipal utility, utility district, or any department, agency or entity of state, county or municipal government; provided, however, that, if the board, utility, district, department, agency or entity employs, retains or otherwise arranges for lobbyist services in this state by a contractor, subcontractor or other representative who is not an employee of such board, utility, district, department, agency or entity, then “lobby” includes communications by the contractor, subcontractor or other representative, and the contractor, subcontractor or other representative shall comply with the lobbying registration and other provisions of this part pertaining to lobbyists; provided further, however, that the board, utility, district, department, agency or entity that employs the contractor, subcontractor or other representative is not deemed to be an employer of a lobbyist for purposes of this part;

“Lobby” does not mean communications with officials of the executive branch by any person to promote, oppose, or otherwise influence the outcome of a decision related to the issuance or award of a bond, grant, lease, loan or incentive pursuant to §§ 4-3-701 — 4-3-733; and

“Lobby” does not mean communications with officials of the executive branch by any person to promote, oppose, or otherwise influence the outcome of a decision related to any component of an economic development incentive package; provided, that any person who is otherwise required to register as a lobbyist under the provisions of the Comprehensive Governmental Ethics Reform Act of 2006, Acts 2006, ch. 1 of the extraordinary session of the 104th general assembly, shall not be deemed to fall within this exception;

“Lobbying firm” means any firm, corporation, partnership or other business entity that regularly supplies lobbying services to others for compensation;

“Lobbyist” means any person who engages in lobbying for compensation;

“Ministerial action” means an action that a person performs in a prescribed manner in obedience to the mandate of legal authority, without regard to, or the exercise of, the person's own judgment upon the propriety of the action being taken;

“Official in the executive branch” means the governor, any member of the governor's staff, any member or employee of a state regulatory commission, including, without limitation, commissioners of the Tennessee public utility commission, or any member or employee of any executive department or agency or other state body in the executive branch. “Official in the executive branch” also includes any administrative governmental official or employee of any county exercising the authority set forth in § 8-17-103(b);

“Official in the legislative branch” means any member, member-elect, any staff person or employee of the general assembly or any member of a commission established by and responsible to the general assembly or either house of the general assembly who takes legislative action. “Official in the legislative branch” also includes the secretary of state, treasurer, and comptroller of the treasury and any employee of those offices. “Official in the legislative branch” also includes any legislative governmental official or employee of any county exercising the authority set forth in § 8-17-103(b);

“Person” means any individual, partnership, committee, association, corporation, labor organization, or any other organization or group of persons;

“Random audit information” means information obtained pursuant to an examination of a lobbyist's employment contract, job description or other documentation in order to determine that no contingency fee arrangement prohibited under § 3-6-304(k) is included and that the date of employment as a lobbyist is consistent with the registration statements filed by both the lobbyist and employer. “Random audit information” also means information obtained pursuant to a review of the total lobbying and lobbying-related compensation and expenses paid to the lobbyist by an employer that will be checked against the range of expenditures reported by the employer in a random audit. As provided in § 3-6-106(a)(4), information contained in statements filed with the commission for more than two (2) years shall not serve as the basis for a random audit. Nothing contained in this subdivision (22) shall prevent the commissioner, upon a finding of probable cause to believe that an employer or lobbyist has violated this part from initiating an investigatory audit; and

“Solicit” means to entreat, to implore, to ask, to attempt, or to try to obtain.

Acts 2006 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 35; 2006, ch. 773, § 1; 2007, ch. 161, §§ 1, 2; 2008, ch. 697, § 3; 2017, ch. 94, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2006 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 1 provided that the act is and may be cited as the “Comprehensive Governmental Ethics Reform Act of 2006.”

Amendments. The 2017 amendment substituted “commissioners of the Tennessee public utility commission” for “directors of the Tennessee regulatory authority” in the first sentence of the definition of “official in the executive branch”.

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 94, § 83. April 4, 2017.

Attorney General Opinions. Lobbyist campaign donations, OAG 06-025 (2/6/06).

Board members and employees of the Tennessee student assistance corporation are subject to the prohibitions contained in T.C.A. §§3-6-304 and3-6-305, as well as the jurisdiction of the Tennessee ethics commission, OAG 08-172, 2008 Tenn. AG LEXIS 202 (11/10/08).

3-6-302. Electronic registration of lobbyists and employers of lobbyists — Lobbyist photographs — Amendment of inaccuracies — Consolidated statements — Fees.

Not later than seven (7) days after becoming an employer of a lobbyist, the employer shall electronically register with the Tennessee ethics commission. Each year thereafter, the employer shall register in the same manner, if the employer continues to employ one (1) or more lobbyists.

Not later than seven (7) days after becoming a lobbyist, the lobbyist shall electronically register with the ethics commission. The information provided by the lobbyist shall include, but not be limited to, the lobbyist's name and birthdate, and the last four (4) digits of the lobbyist's social security number; provided, that the last four (4) digits of the lobbyist's social security number is not a public record and shall only be used by the state or a local governmental entity for purposes related to the administration of chapter 519 of the Public Acts of 2012. Each year thereafter, the lobbyist shall register in the same manner if the lobbyist continues to engage in lobbying.

Within thirty (30) days after registering, each lobbyist shall provide a current photographic portrait to the ethics commission; however, no lobbyist shall be required to submit more than one (1) portrait during any year.

As a component of the registration process, each employer of a lobbyist shall electronically file a registration statement that includes the following information:

Employer's name, business address, telephone number and e-mail address; and, in the case of a corporation, association or governmental entity, the names of the individuals performing the functions of chief executive officer and chief financial officer;

Name, business address, telephone number and e-mail address of each lobbyist authorized to represent the employer; and

Verification that the employer has downloaded from the commission web site or otherwise obtained the commission's manual for lobbyists and employers of lobbyists.

As a component of the registration process, each lobbyist shall electronically file a registration statement that includes the following information:

Lobbyist's name, business address, telephone number and e-mail address;

Name, business address, telephone number and e-mail address of each employer the lobbyist is authorized to represent;

Subject matters lobbied for such employers during the registration year, to be indicated among general categories listed by the ethics commission;

Name and business address of any member of the lobbyist's immediate family who is an official within the legislative or executive branch; and

The extent of any direct business arrangement or partnership between the lobbyist and any candidate for public office or any official in the legislative or executive branch.

Throughout the year, by amendment electronically filed with the ethics commission, each employer of a lobbyist and each lobbyist shall update, correct or otherwise modify the employer's or lobbyist's registration statement not later than seven (7) days following the occurrence of any event, action or changed circumstance that renders the registration statement inaccurate or incomplete.

A lobbying firm shall be authorized, by rule promulgated pursuant to § 4-55-103(1), to file consolidated lobbyist registration, registration statements, and registration amendments on behalf of all partners, associates and employees within the firm; however, the partners, associates and employees of the firm shall be individually named and shall remain individually accountable for the timeliness and accuracy of the consolidated filing.

Registration fees for employers of lobbyists and registration fees for lobbyists shall be established by rule, promulgated pursuant to § 4-55-103(1). The registration fee shall be paid not later than thirty (30) days following submission of a registration statement or amendment through which an employer reports a lobbyist or additional lobbyist or through which a lobbyist reports an employer or additional employer.

Employer and lobbyist registration statements, as may be amended, as well as lobbyist photographs, shall be promptly posted on the commission's Internet site.

The initial registration year for lobbyists and employers of lobbyists shall be the period from October 1, 2006, through December 31, 2007. Thereafter, the registration year for lobbyists and employers of lobbyists shall be the period of January 1 through December 31.

Acts 2006 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 35; 2007, ch. 413, §§ 2, 3; 2009, ch. 556, §§ 21, 22; 2012, ch. 519, § 7.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2006 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 1 provided that the act is and may be cited as the “Comprehensive Governmental Ethics Reform Act of 2006.”

Cross-References. Bureau of ethics and campaign finance, title 4, ch. 55.

Collateral References.

Validity, construction, and application of state and municipal enactments regulating lobbying and of lobbying contracts. 35 A.L.R.6th 1.

3-6-303. Biannual employer disclosure reports.

Within forty-five (45) days following conclusion of the six-month periods ending June 30 and December 31, each employer of a lobbyist shall electronically file with the ethics commission the employer disclosure report. For the six-month period, the report shall disclose the following information on a single electronic form:

The aggregate total amount of lobbyist compensation paid by the employer. For purposes of the disclosure, compensation paid to any lobbyist who performs duties for the employer in addition to lobbying and related activities shall be apportioned to reflect the lobbyist's time allocated for lobbying and related activities in this state. The aggregate total amount of such lobbyist compensation shall be reported within one (1) of the following ranges:

Less than $10,000;

At least $10,000 but less than $25,000;

At least $25,000 but less than $50,000;

At least $50,000 but less than $100,000;

At least $100,000 but less than $150,000;

At least $150,000 but less than $200,000;

At least $200,000 but less than $250,000;

At least $250,000 but less than $300,000;

At least $300,000 but less than $350,000;

At least $350,000 but less than $400,000; or

$400,000 or more; provided, however, that, if the aggregate total amount is reported within this range, then the employer shall round the aggregate total amount to the nearest $50,000 and also report the rounded amount within the disclosure report;

Excluding lobbyist compensation, the aggregate total amount of employer expenditures incurred for the purpose of influencing legislative or administrative action through public opinion or grassroots action, including, but not necessarily limited to, any such expenditures for printing, publishing, advertising, broadcasting, paid announcements, audiotapes, videotapes, compact discs, digital video discs, infomercials, rallies, demonstrations, seminars, lectures, conferences, postage, telephone-related costs, Internet-related services, public relations services, governmental relations services, polling services, travel expenses, grants to issue groups or grassroots organizations, or any similar expense. For purposes of this disclosure, any such expenditure that is made for the purpose of achieving a multistate effect shall be apportioned equally among such states. The aggregate total amount of these employer expenditures shall be reported within one (1) of the following ranges:

Less than $10,000;

At least $10,000 but less than $25,000;

At least $25,000 but less than $50,000;

At least $50,000 but less than $100,000;

At least $100,000 but less than $150,000;

At least $150,000 but less than $200,000;

At least $200,000 but less than $250,000;

At least $250,000 but less than $300,000;

At least $300,000 but less than $350,000;

At least $350,000 but less than $400,000; or

$400,000 or more; provided, however, if the aggregate total amount is reported within this range, then the employer shall round the aggregate total amount to the nearest $50,000 and also report the rounded amount within the disclosure report; and

The aggregate total amount of all employer expenditures for any event permissible under § 3-6-305(b)(8).

Employer disclosure reports shall be promptly posted on the commission's web site. Any such posting of an employer's aggregate total expenditures disclosed pursuant to subdivision (a)(3) shall be supplemented by the commission with other information related to such event or events, delivered or reported to the commission pursuant to § 3-6-305(b)(8).

Acts 2006 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 35; 2011, ch. 98, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2006 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 1 provided that the act is and may be cited as the “Comprehensive Governmental Ethics Reform Act of 2006.”

Collateral References.

Validity, construction, and application of state and municipal enactments regulating lobbying and of lobbying contracts. 35 A.L.R.6th 1.

3-6-304. Restrictions on lobbying.

No employer of a lobbyist, lobbyist or any person acting at the specific direction of an employer or lobbyist shall offer or attempt to offer anything of value to an official in the legislative or executive branch, or to the official's immediate family, based on any stated or tacit understanding that the official's vote, official action or judgment would be influenced thereby.

No employer of a lobbyist or lobbyist shall knowingly make or cause to be made any false statement or misrepresentation of the facts concerning any matter for which the lobbyist is registered to lobby to any official in the legislative or executive branch.

No official in the legislative or executive branch, or a member of the official's staff or immediate family, shall solicit or accept anything of value in violation of subsection (a).

No lobbyist shall make a loan of money to a candidate for public office, official in the legislative or executive branch, or to anyone on their behalf.

No candidate for public office, official in the legislative or executive branch, or a member of the official's staff or immediate family, shall solicit or accept a loan in violation of subsection (d).

No employer of a lobbyist, lobbyist or any person acting at the direction of an employer or lobbyist shall pay or agree to pay a candidate for public office or official in the legislative or executive branch compensation for property or services substantially in excess of that charged in the ordinary course of business.

No employer of a lobbyist, lobbyist or any person acting at the direction of an employer or lobbyist shall permit a candidate for public office, official in the legislative or executive branch or a staff member, or a member of the candidate or official's immediate family, to use the credit or credit card of the employer or lobbyist or any other credit card over which the employer or the lobbyist has control.

Except to the extent permissible under § 3-6-305, no employer of a lobbyist, lobbyist or any person acting at the direction of an employer or lobbyist shall pay the lodging expenses of an official in the legislative or executive branch or immediate family of the official.

No employer of a lobbyist or multicandidate political campaign committee controlled by an employer of a lobbyist shall make any campaign contribution to a candidate for the office of governor or member of the general assembly during any regular annual session or any extraordinary session of the general assembly.

No lobbyist shall offer or make any campaign contribution, including any in-kind contribution, to or on behalf of the governor, any judge or chancellor, or any member of the general assembly, or any candidate for the office of governor, supreme court judge, court of appeals judge, court of criminal appeals judge, circuit court judge, chancellor, juvenile court judge, general sessions judge, state senator, or state representative.

No employer of a lobbyist shall offer or pay and no lobbyist shall solicit or accept any fee, compensation or bonus for lobbying wherein the amount of the fee, compensation or bonus is contingent upon achievement of an outcome deemed to be successful for the employer.

No member of the general assembly, elected official in the executive branch, member of the governor's cabinet, or cabinet level staff within the governor's office shall be a lobbyist during the twelve-month period immediately following departure from such office or employment.

No lobbyist shall serve as a member of any board, commission or governmental entity of state government having jurisdiction to regulate the business endeavors or professional activities of any employer of the lobbyist; nor shall any lobbyist serve as a member of the state election commission or any county election commission; provided, that this prohibition does not apply to a lobbyist serving on an election commission on February 15, 2006, as long as the lobbyist continuously serves as a member of that commission.

No official in the legislative or executive branch shall accept travel expenses, meals or lodging paid pursuant to § 2-10-116(a), if payment of the travel expenses, meals or lodging violates this section or constitutes a prohibited gift under § 3-6-305.

Acts 2006 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 35; 2015, ch. 280, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2006 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 1 provided that the act is and may be cited as the “Comprehensive Governmental Ethics Reform Act of 2006.”

Acts 2006 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 53 provides that this section shall take effect on February 15, 2006, the public welfare requiring it; and, notwithstanding any provision of this act or any other law to the contrary, from February 15, 2006, through September 30, 2006, the registry of election finance shall implement and enforce §§3-6-304 and3-6-305, in the same manner and to the same extent that the ethics commission is authorized to implement and enforce such provisions on and after October 1, 2006.

Amendments. The 2015 amendment rewrote (j), which read: “No lobbyist shall offer or make any campaign contribution, including any in-kind contribution, to or on behalf of the governor or any member of the general assembly or any candidate for the office of governor, state senator or state representative.”

Effective Dates. Acts 2015, ch. 280, § 2. April 28, 2015.

Collateral References.

Validity, construction, and application of state and municipal enactments regulating lobbying and of lobbying contracts. 35 A.L.R.6th 1.

3-6-305. Prohibited gifts — Exceptions.

No employer of a lobbyist or lobbyist may provide a gift, directly or indirectly, to a candidate for public office, official in the legislative branch, official in the executive branch, or immediate family of such candidate or official.

A candidate for public office, an official in the legislative branch, or an official in the executive branch, or the immediate family of such candidate or official, may not solicit or accept, directly or indirectly, a gift from an employer of a lobbyist or a lobbyist.

The following are not subject to the prohibition in subsection (a):

Benefits resulting from business, employment, or other outside activities of a candidate or official or the immediate family of a candidate or official, if such benefits are customarily provided to others in similar circumstances and are not enhanced due to the status of the candidate or official;

Informational materials in the form of books, articles, periodicals, other written materials, audiotapes, videotapes, or other forms of communication;

Gifts that are given for a nonbusiness purpose and motivated by close personal friendship, but only to the extent such gifts are specifically defined and authorized by the rules of the ethics commission;

Sample merchandise, promotional items, and appreciation tokens, if such merchandise, items and tokens are routinely given to customers, suppliers or potential customers or suppliers in the ordinary course of business;

Unsolicited tokens or awards of appreciation, honorary degrees, or bona fide awards in recognition of public service in the form of a plaque, trophy, desk item, wall memento and similar items; provided, that any such item shall not be in a form that can be readily converted to cash;

Opportunities and benefits made available to all members of an appropriate class of the general public, including, but not limited to:

Discounts afforded to the general public or specified groups or occupations under normal business conditions, except that such discounts may not be based on the status of the candidate or official;

Prizes and awards given in public contests; and

Benefits of participation in events held within the state and sponsored by, or for the benefit of, charitable organizations as defined in § 48-101-501, if provided by an employer of a lobbyist to an official in the executive branch or to an official in the legislative branch; provided, that such events are open to participation by persons other than officials in the executive branch or officials in the legislative branch or the official's immediate family and any benefits received are not enhanced due to the status of the official in the executive or legislative branch; or provided, that invitations are extended to the entire membership of the general assembly;

Expenses for out-of-state travel, if such expenses are paid for or reimbursed by a governmental entity or an established and recognized organization of elected or appointed state government officials, staff of state government officials or both officials and staff, or any other established and recognized organization that is an umbrella organization for such officials, staff, or both officials and staff;

Entertainment, food, refreshments, meals, beverages, amenities, goody bags, exhibitor promotional items given in the exhibit hall to conference attendees, health screenings, lodging, or admission tickets that are provided in connection with, and are arranged or coordinated through the employees or designated agents of, a conference, if the conference is sponsored by an established and recognized organization of elected or appointed state government officials, staff of state government officials or both officials and staff, or any other established and recognized organization that is an umbrella organization for such officials, staff, or both officials and staff. For purposes of this subdivision (b)(7)(B), any entertainment, food, refreshments, meals, beverages, amenities, goody bags, or admission tickets provided at events designated as a state night or other events for attendees of the conference shall be deemed to be provided in connection with, and arranged or coordinated through the employees or designated agents of the conference;

Entertainment, food, refreshments, meals, beverages, or health screenings that are provided in connection with an in-state event to which invitations are extended to the entire membership of the general assembly; however, a copy of the invitation shall be delivered to the ethics commission and to each member of the general assembly at least seven (7) days in advance of the event by the employer or lobbyist paying for the event; provided further, however, that, within thirty (30) days following the event, the employer or lobbyist shall electronically report to the commission the total aggregate cost paid for the event, as well as the per person contractual cost for the event or the per person cost for the event based on the number of persons invited, which shall not exceed fifty dollars ($50.00) per person per day, excluding sales tax and gratuity. The value of any such gift may not be reduced below the monetary limitation by dividing the cost of the gift among two (2) or more lobbyists or employers of lobbyists. All such information delivered or reported to the commission shall be promptly posted on the commission's Internet site. The filing of a consolidated report may be authorized by rule, promulgated pursuant to § 4-55-103(1), if the costs of the event are shared by two (2) or more employers or lobbyists; however, any such report shall specify the allocation of the costs among the employers or lobbyists; provided further, however, that the employers or lobbyists shall remain individually accountable for the timeliness and accuracy of the consolidated filing. The fifty dollar ($50.00) limitation shall be increased to the nearest one dollar ($1.00) amount to reflect the percentage of change in the average consumer price index (all items-city average) as published by the United States department of labor, bureau of labor statistics, every odd-numbered year on January 1, starting in 2007. The ethics commission shall publish the increased amount on its web site;

Entertainment, food, refreshments, meals, amenities, or beverages that are provided in connection with an in-state event at which a candidate for public office, an official in the legislative branch or an official in the executive branch, or an immediate family member of the candidate or official is a speaker or part of a panel discussion at a scheduled meeting of an established and recognized membership organization that has regular meetings; however, the cost of the entertainment, food, refreshments, meals, amenities, or beverages shall be paid for or reimbursed by the membership organization and the per person cost of the event, which shall not exceed fifty dollars ($50.00) per person per day, excluding sales tax and gratuity. The value of any such gift may not be reduced below such monetary limitation by dividing the cost of the gift among two (2) or more lobbyists or employers of lobbyists. The fifty dollar ($50.00) limitation shall be increased to the nearest one dollar ($1.00) amount to reflect the percentage of change in the average consumer price index (all items-city average) as published by the United States department of labor, bureau of labor statistics, every odd-numbered year on January 1 starting in 2007. The ethics commission shall publish the increased amount on its web site;

Food, refreshments, meals, or beverages that are provided by an employer of a lobbyist in connection with an in-state event to which invitations are extended to an official or officials in the legislative branch or official or officials in the executive branch; provided, that:

No employer of a lobbyist may provide food, refreshments, meals, or beverages, the value of which to the official exceeds fifty dollars ($50.00) per event per day, excluding sales tax and gratuity; nor may such employer of a lobbyist provide any such items to any official pursuant to this subdivision (b)(10)(A)(i) that have a cumulative value of more than one hundred dollars ($100) to the official during a calendar year;

The value of any such gift may not be reduced below such monetary limitations by dividing the cost of the gift among two (2) or more employers of lobbyists;

This exception to the prohibition in subsection (a) only applies to a member or members of the general assembly, if the member or members do not receive a per diem allowance pursuant to § 3-1-106, for the day on which the event is held and the member or members do not receive any food, refreshments, meals or beverages that are provided in connection with the in-state event that are not offered or provided to other nonmembers in attendance at the event; and

An officer or management-level employee of each employer of a lobbyist paying for the event shall attend the event; however, a lobbyist shall not be considered to be an officer or management-level employee of an employer of the lobbyist paying for the event for purposes of this subdivision (b)(10)(A)(iv).

The fifty dollar ($50.00) and one hundred dollar ($100) amounts in subdivision (b)(10)(A)(i) shall be increased to the nearest one dollar ($1.00) amount to reflect the percentage of change in the average consumer price index (all items-city average) as published by the United States department of labor, bureau of labor statistics, every odd-numbered year on January 1 starting in 2007. The ethics commission shall publish the increased amount on its web site;

Occasional or incidental local travel for which no fare is ordinarily charged; or

[Expired, see the Compiler’s Notes]

If an official in the legislative or executive branch attends an event and accepts a gift that is provided by a person or entity not subject to the prohibition set forth in § 3-6-305(a), and if a lobbyist also attends the event and knows or has reason to know that the gift has been provided at the suggestion or direction of the lobbyist, then, within seven (7) days following the event, the lobbyist shall electronically report the following information to the ethics commission:

Name of the official or family member;

Nature and purpose of the event;

Name, address and business of the person or entity that provided the gift;

Description of the gift; and

Cost of the gift; however, if the cost of the gift is unknown and not reasonably discernible by the lobbyist, then the lobbyist shall report a good faith estimate of the cost of the gift.

A gift made contrary to this section, shall not be a violation of this section, if the candidate, official or immediate family member does not use the gift and returns it to the donor within the latter of ten (10) days of receipt or ten (10) days of having knowledge that the gift was a violation or pays consideration of equal or greater value within the latter of ten (10) days of receipt or ten (10) days of having knowledge that the gift was a violation.

Acts 2006 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 35; 2006, ch. 803, § 1; 2008, ch. 965, § 2; 2009, ch. 556, § 23.

Compiler's Notes. Section 501(c)(3), referred to in this section, is codified at 26 U.S.C. § 501(c)(3).

Acts 2006 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 1 provided that the act is and may be cited as the “Comprehensive Governmental Ethics Reform Act of 2006.”

Former subdivision (b)(12) provided that its provisions, which related to contributions to a fund established and controlled by a 501(c)(3) corporation for the benefit of an extremely ill immediate family member, would expire when the ethics commission promulgated rules pursuant to subdivision (b)(3) concerning gifts for nonbusiness purposes and motivated by close personal friendships. Such rules have been promulgated and, therefore, subdivision (b)(12) has expired.

Cross-References. Bureau of ethics and campaign finance, title 4, ch. 55.

Collateral References.

Validity, construction, and application of state and municipal enactments regulating lobbying and of lobbying contracts. 35 A.L.R.6th 1.